nb: Siltype: Kurvfilter; Chinois; Konisk sil; Dobbel nettingfilter; Finmasket sil; Fettfilter; Oljefilter; Perforert sil; Skimmer; Edderkoppsil; Sprutskjerm; Seilduk; Annet
el: Τύπος σουρωτηριού: Σουρωτήρι καλαθιού; Τύπου chinois; Κωνικό φίλτρο; Διπλό σουρωτήρι; Κόσκινο λεπτού πλέγματος; Φίλτρο λίπους; Φίλτρο λαδιού; Διάτρητο σουρωτήρι; Μηχάνημα στράγγισης; Σουρωτήρι αράχνης; Σίτα προστασίας από πιτσίλισμα; Tamis; Άλλο
hr-HR: Vrsta cjedila: Cjedilo u obliku košarice; Chinois; Konusno cjedilo; Cjedilo s dvostrukom mrežom; Sito s finom mrežom; Cjedilo za masnoću; Cjedilo za ulje; Perforirano cjedilo; Rupičasta žlica; Cjedilo u obliku grabilice; Zaštita od prskanja; Za prah; Ostalo
sv: Typ av sil: Korgfilter; Chinois-sil; Konisk sil; Dubbelmaskig sil; Finmaskig sil; Fettsil; Oljefilter; Perforerad sil; Skimmer; Spindelsil; Stänkskärm; Tamis; Annat
ko: 스트레이너 유형: 바스켓 스트레이너; 시누아; 원뿔형 여과기; 이중망 여과기; 가는 망사 체; 기름 찌꺼기 여과기; 오일 여과기; 타공 여과기; 거품 건지개; 거미줄형 여과기; 기름 튐 방지망; 타미; 기타
vi: Loại rây: Rổ lọc; Kiểu Trung Quốc; Lưới lọc hình nón; Lưới lọc hai lớp; Rây lưới mịn; Lưới lọc mỡ; Lưới lọc dầu; Lưới lọc đục lỗ; Vá thủng; Vá lưới; Vung chắn dầu mỡ; Rây; Khác
ro-RO: Tipul de strecurătoare: Strecurătoare coș; Chinois; Strecurătoare conică; Strecurătoare cu plasă dublă; Sită cu plasă fină; Strecurătoare pentru grăsime; Strecurătoare pentru ulei; Strecurătoare perforată; Spumieră; Strecurătoare păianjen; Ecran anti-stropi; Sită tip tambur; Altele
lt-LT: Sietelio tipas: Krepšelio sietelis; „Chinois“; Kūginis filtras; Dvigubo tinklelio sietelis; Smulkaus tinklelio sietas; Riebalų filtras; Alyvos filtras; Perforuotas sietelis; Nugriebtuvas; Voro formos koštuvas; Apsauginis dangtis nuo taškymosi; „Tamis“; Kita
bg-BG: Тип цедка: Цедка тип „кошница“; Конусовидно; Конична цедка; Цедка с двойна мрежа; Фино сито; Цедка за мазнини; Цедка за олио; Перфорирана цедка; Цедка тип „лъжица“; Цедка тип „паяк“; Предпазна мрежа; Барабанно сито; Друго
tr: Süzgeç tipi: Sepet tipi süzgeç; Çin tipi; Konik süzgeç; Çift katmanlı süzgeç; İnce gözenekli elek; Yağ süzgeci; Yağ süzgeci; Delikli süzgeç; Kevgir; Örümcek süzgeç; Yağ sıçratmaz kapak; Tamis; Diğer
sk-SK: Typ sitka: Košíkové sito; Francúzske sitko (chinois); Kužeľové sito; Sito s dvojitou mriežkou; Jemné sito; Tukový filter; Olejový filter; Perforované sito; Dierkovaná naberačka; Cediaca naberačka; Ochranná plachta proti postriekaniu; Francúzske jemné sitko (tamis); Iné
nl: Zeeftype: Zeefmand; Puntzeef; Puntzeef; Dubbelmazige zeef; Fijnmazige zeef; Vetzeef; Oliezeef; Geperforeerde zeef; Schuimspaan; Spinnenzeef; Spatscherm; Trommelzeef; Overig
ru: Тип сита: Корзиночный фильтр; Коническое; Конический фильтр; Двухсетчатый фильтр; Сито с мелкой сеткой; Фильтр для жира; Масляный фильтр; Перфорированный фильтр; Скиммер; Сетчатое сито; Сетка от брызг; Барабанное; Другое
th: ประเภทของตะแกรงกรอง: ตะแกรงกรองแบบตะกร้า; ชีนัวส์; ตะแกรงกรองทรงกรวย; ตะแกรงกรองสองชั้น; ตะแกรงตาข่ายละเอียด; ตะแกรงกรองไขมัน; ตะแกรงกรองน้ำมัน; ตะแกรงกรองมีรูเจาะ; ตะแกรงตัก; ตะแกรงตักแบบสไปเดอร์; ฝาปิดกันกระเด็น; แบบแบน; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 滤网的类型: 篮式滤网; 锥形细筛; 锥形滤网; 双层滤网; 细网筛; 油脂滤网; 滤油网; 多孔滤网; 除沫器; 笊篱; 防溅网; 鼓式平筛; 其他
ja: ストレーナーの種類: バスケットストレーナー; シノワ; 円錐形ストレーナー; ダブルメッシュストレーナー; 微細メッシュのふるい; グリースストレーナー; オイルストレーナー; 穴あきストレーナー; スキマー; スパイダーストレーナー; 飛び散り防止スクリーン; タミス; その他
sl-SI: Vrsta cedila: Cedilo za košaro; Kitajec; Stožčasto cedilo; Dvojno mrežasto cedilo; Sito z drobno mrežico; Cedilo za maščobo; Cedilo za olje; Perforirano cedilo; Pripomoček; Pajkovo cedilo; Zaščita za brizganje; Tamis; Druga
hu: Szűrő típusa: Szűrőkosár; Kínai; Kúpos szűrő; Dupla hálós szűrő; Finomszövésű szűrő; Zsírszűrő; Olajszűrő; Perforált szűrő; Medenceszűrő; Hálós szűrő; Fröccsenésvédő; Szitaszövet; Egyéb
zh-TW: 濾網類型: 籃式過濾篩; 細篩; 錐形過濾篩; 雙層網篩; 細網篩; 油脂過濾篩; 濾油器; 穿孔過濾篩; 撇渣器; 笊籬; 防噴油網; 麵粉篩; 其他
fi: Siivilätyyppi: Korisiivilä; Kartionmuotoinen; Kartiomainen siivilä; Kaksinkertaisen verkon siivilä; Hienojakoinen siivilä; Rasvasiivilä; Öljysiivilä; Rei'itetty siivilä; Pintakaivon siivilä; Hämähäkkisiivilä; Roiskesuoja; Tamis; Muu
it: Tipo di colino: Cestello per scolare; Chinois; Colino conico; Filtro a doppia maglia; Setaccio a maglie fini; Filtro per grassi; Filtro dell'olio; Colino forato; Schiumatoio; Colino a ragno; Coperchio paraschizzi; Tamis; Altro
fr: Type de passoire: Passoire panier; Chinois; Passoire conique; Passoire à double maille; Tamis à mailles fines; Filtre à graisse; Filtre à huile; Passoire perforée; Écumoire; Passoire araignée; Couvercle anti-projection; Tamis; Autre
es: Tipo de colador: Colador de cesta; Chino; Colador cónico; Colador de doble malla; Tamiz de malla fina; Colador de grasa; Colador de aceite; Colador perforado; Desnatadora; Colador de araña; Malla antisalpicaduras; Tamizador; Otros
pt-BR: Tipo de coador: Coador tipo cesto; Chinois; Coador cônico; Coador de malha dupla; Peneira de malha fina; Coador de gordura; Coador de óleo; Coador perfurado; Escumadeira; Coador tipo aranha; Protetor contra respingos; Peneira; Outro
en: Strainer type: Basket strainer; Chinois; Conical strainer; Double mesh strainer; Fine mesh sieve; Grease strainer; Oil strainer; Perforated strainer; Skimmer; Spider strainer; Splatter screen; Tamis; Other
pl: Typ sitka: Sitko koszykowe; Chinois; Sitko stożkowe; Sitko podwójna siatka; Sitko drobnooczkowe; Sitko do tłuszczu; Sitko do oleju; Sitko perforowane; Łyżka cedzakowa; Sitko typu spider; Osłona przeciwpryskowa; Tamis; Inne
cs: Typ síta: Košíkové sítko; Chinois (kužel); Kónické sítko; Dvojité sítko; Jemné sítko; Sítko na tuk; Sítko na olej; Perforované sítko; Pěnovačka; Pavoučí sítko; Ochranné síto na pánve; Prosévací a pasírovací; Jiné
da: Sitype: Kurvefilter; Kegleformet; Konisk si; Dobbeltmasket si; Finmasket si; Fedtfilter; Oliefilter; Perforeret si; Skimmer; Edderkoppefilter; Stænkskærm; Tamis; Andet
pt-PT: Tipo de coador: Coador de cesto; Chinês; Coador cónico; Coador de malha dupla; Peneira de malha fina; Coador de gordura; Coador de óleo; Coador perfurado; Skimmer; Coador de aranha; Tela anti-salpicos; Peneira; Outro
de: Siebtyp: Korbsieb; Chinois; Konisches Sieb; Doppelsieb; Feinmaschiges Sieb; Fettsieb; Ölsieb; Perforiertes Sieb; Skimmer; Spinnensieb; Spritzschutz; Sieb; Sonstiges